District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-1669

Term and renewal of license.

Repealed.

Mar. 13, 1993, D.C. Law 9-184, § 309, 39 DCR 8208
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1235, 46 DCR 3142

History

1981 Ed., § 2-269.

Prior Codifications

Revision of chapter: See note to § 3-1641.

D.C. Law 12-261, Title I, § 1236, provided:

Editor's Notes